Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20133-324
Board of adjustment;
judicial review; petition; grounds.

Any (1) person
aggrieved or taxpayer affected by any decision of a board of adjustment, (2)
governing body of a political subdivision, or
(3) joint airport zoning board, which is of the opinion that a decision of
a board of adjustment is arbitrary
or capricious, illegal, or
unsupported by evidence, may obtain judicial review of such decision by filing a petition
in error in the district court of the county in which the structure or tree
that is the subject of the decision is located. The filing of and proceeding
on the petition in error shall be in accordance with sections 25-1901 to 25-1937.

Laws 1945, c. 233, § 11(1), p. 689;

Laws 2013, LB140, § 17.